test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Num-iksh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Numeral - ikš: # quantifiers 217 'eng /est üks/fin' - full paradigm
     ikš+Num+Sg+Nom: ikš
     ikš+Num+Sg+Gen: [īʼd, īd]
     ikš+Num+Sg+Par: [īʼdtõ, īdtõ]
     ikš+Num+Sg+Dat: [īʼdõn, īdõn]
     ikš+Num+Sg+Ins: [īʼdkõks, īdkõks]
     ikš+Num+Sg+Ill: [īʼdõ, īdõ]
     ikš+Num+Sg+Ela: [īʼdstõ, īdstõ]
     ikš+Num+Pl+Nom: [īʼd, īd]
     ikš+Num+Pl+Gen: [īʼd, īd]
     ikš+Num+Pl+Par: ikši
     ikš+Num+Pl+Dat: [īʼdõn, īdõn]
     ikš+Num+Pl+Ins: [īʼdkõks, īdkõks]
     ikš+Num+Pl+Ill: [īʼdiž, īdiž]
     ikš+Num+Pl+Ela: [īʼdšti, īdšti]
